Wyoming statutes. Title 6 Crimes and Offenses
Article 1. Generally

Court without jurisdiction to sentence person to state hospital.—

Jurisdiction has not been given to the trial court to sentence a person to the Wyoming state hospital as part of the penalty for criminal activity. Dean v. State, 668 P.2d 639,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 354

(Wyo. 1983) (decided prior to 1983 revision).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Power of court to increase severity of unlawful sentence — modern status, 28 ALR4th 147.

Sentencing: permissibility of sentence to a fine only, under statutory provision for imprisonment or imprisonment and fine, 35 ALR4th 192.

Validity, construction, and application of concurrent sentence doctrine — state cases, 56 ALR5th 385.

§ 6-10-101.
“Felony” and “misdemeanor” defined.

Crimes which may be punished by death or by imprisonment for more than one (1) year are felonies. All other crimes are misdemeanors.

History.

Laws 1982, ch. 75, § 3; 1983, ch. 171, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to expungement of misemeanor records, see §

7-13-1501

.

Instruction properly refused. —

In a prosecution for burglary based on defendant's entering and driving a vehicle without permission, where the prosecutor's argument and evidence was that the felony defendant intended to commit was larceny, the trial court did not err in refusing to give defendant's proffered instruction defining “felony.” Brett v. State, 961 P.2d 385,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 114

(Wyo. 1998).

Applied

in

Hukoveh v. Alston, 25 Wyo. 122, 165 P. 988,

1917 Wyo. LEXIS 12

(1917); Orcutt v. State, 366 P.2d 690,

1961 Wyo. LEXIS 133

(Wyo. 1961).

Quoted

in

Wyoming. Waxler v. State, 67 Wyo. 396, 224 P.2d 514,

1950 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(1950); State ex rel. Hoke v. Owens, 733 P.2d 240,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 396

(Wyo. 1987).

Stated

in

Town of Jackson v. Shaw, 569 P.2d 1246,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 288

(Wyo. 1977); Daugherty v. State, 2002 WY 52, 44 P.3d 28,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 53

(Wyo. 2002).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Disinheriting a Murderer of an Ancestor,” see 8 Wyo. L.J. 132.

For article, “Disparity and the Sentencing Process in Wyoming District Courts: Recommendations for Change,” see XI Land & Water L. Rev. 525 (1976).

For comment, “Miranda and Misdemeanors,” see XIV Land & Water L. Rev. 521 (1979).

For comment, “The Institutional Transfer Statute: Three Challenges to the Imprisonment of Juvenile Offenders,” see XVII Land & Water L. Rev. 643 (1982).

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part two), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 509 (1984).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Voluntary absence of accused when sentence is pronounced, 59 ALR5th 135.

§ 6-10-102.
Imposition of fine for any felony; maximum fine where not established by statute; court automation fee; indigent civil legal services fee.

The court may impose a fine as part of the punishment for any felony. If the statute does not establish a maximum fine, the fine shall be not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000.00). The court shall impose a court automation fee of forty dollars ($40.00) in every criminal case wherein the defendant is found guilty, enters a plea of guilty or no contest or is placed on probation under W.S.

7-13-301

. The fee shall be remitted as provided by W.S.

5-3-205

. In addition to the court automation fee the court shall impose an indigent civil legal services fee of ten dollars ($10.00) in every criminal case wherein the defendant is found guilty, enters a plea of guilty or no contest or is placed on probation under W.S.

7-13-301

or

35-7-1037

. The indigent civil legal services fee shall be remitted as provided in W.S.

5-3-205

(a)(ii).

History.

Laws 1982, ch. 75, § 3; 1983, ch. 171, § 1; 2000, ch. 25, § 2; 2010, ch. 109, § 2; 2017 ch. 105, § 1, effective July 1, 2017; 2020 ch. 66, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, added the present last two sentences.

The 2017 amendment

, effective July 1, 2017, substituted “a court automation fee of twenty-five dollars ($25.00)” for “a court automation fee of ten dollars ($10.00)” in the second sentence.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, substituted “forty dollars ($40.00)” for “twenty-five dollars ($25.00).”

Amended Sentence.—

District court had the authority on remand to amend defendant's sentence because the amended sentence was consistent with the district court's original sentence and merely reconfirmed that the statutorily-mandated fees remained part of defendant sentence; the statutory assessments were imposed because defendant had been convicted of a crime, and on remand, he still was convicted of a crime.
Hawes v. State, 2016 WY 30, 368 P.3d 879,

2016 Wyo. LEXIS 32

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 2016 WY 30,

2016 Wyo. LEXIS 44

(Wyo. 2016).

Construction.—

Statutes indicate that the fees are imposed as a result of being convicted in a criminal case, not as part of the sentence for any particular crime; the statutes envision that sentencing courts impose the mandated fees separately as part of the overall sentence, rather than as part of the sentence for an individual charge.
Hawes v. State, 2016 WY 30, 368 P.3d 879,

2016 Wyo. LEXIS 32

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 2016 WY 30,

2016 Wyo. LEXIS 44

(Wyo. 2016).

Sentence Not Illegal.—

District court properly denied defendant's motions to correct an illegal sentence because there was no increase in punishment and no violation of his double jeopardy protections; all of the fees imposed upon defendant's conviction were mandated by statute, and thus, it was unnecessary for the district court to attach the fees to the stalking charge in the initial sentence.
Hawes v. State, 2016 WY 30, 368 P.3d 879,

2016 Wyo. LEXIS 32

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 2016 WY 30,

2016 Wyo. LEXIS 44

(Wyo. 2016).

Waiver. —

When defendant entered a plea of guilty to felony attempted larceny, he did not raise a claim in the district court challenging the assessment of an indigent civil legal services fee under this section; therefore, the issue could not be considered on appeal under Wyo. R. Crim. P. 11(b)(1)(C).
Morrison v. State, 2012 WY 41, 272 P.3d 321,

2012 Wyo. LEXIS 44

(Wyo. 2012).

Death sentence and fine. —

A court may impose a fine upon a defendant in addition to sentence of death, and such sentence does not amount to cruel and unusual punishment. Jenkins v. State, 22 Wyo. 34, 134 P. 260,

1913 Wyo. LEXIS 35

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 22 Wyo. 34, 135 P. 749,

1913 Wyo. LEXIS 36

(Wyo. 1913).

Stated in

McGarvey v. State, 2014 WY 66,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 71

(May 28, 2014).

Cited

in

Griswold v. State, 994 P.2d 920,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 200

(Wyo. 1999).

Applied in

Chapman v. State, 2013 WY 57,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 62

(May 10, 2013).

Law reviews. —

For article, “The Changing Structure of Criminal Sentencing,” see XVIII Land & Water L. Rev. 591 (1983).

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part two), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 509 (1984).

For article, “The Wyoming Criminal Code Revisited: Reflections after Fifteen Years,” see XXXIII Land and Water L. Rev. 523 (1998).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Propriety of applying cash bail to payment of fine, 42 ALR5th 547.

§ 6-10-103.
Penalties for misdemeanors where not prescribed by statute; court automation fee; indigent civil legal services fee.

Unless a different penalty is prescribed by law, every crime declared to be a misdemeanor is punishable by imprisonment in the county jail for not more than six (6) months, a fine of not more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00), or both. The court shall impose a court automation fee of forty dollars ($40.00) in every criminal case wherein the defendant is found guilty, enters a plea of guilty or no contest or is placed on probation under W.S.

7-13-301

. The fee shall be remitted as provided by W.S.

5-3-205

. In addition to the court automation fee the court shall impose an indigent civil legal services fee of ten dollars ($10.00) in every criminal case wherein the defendant is found guilty, enters a plea of guilty or no contest or is placed on probation under W.S.

7-13-301

. The indigent civil legal services fee shall be remitted as provided in W.S.

5-3-205

(a)(ii).

History.

Laws 1982, ch. 75, § 3; 1983, ch. 171, § 1; 2000, ch. 25, § 2; 2010, ch. 109, § 2; 2017 ch. 105, § 1, effective July 1, 2017; 2020 ch. 66, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

Cross references. —

As to maximum fine and imprisonment permitted in municipal courts of cities of the first class, see §

5-6-210

.

As to maximum fine and imprisonment permitted in municipal courts in incorporated towns, see §

5-6-301

.

As to payment of costs of prosecution, see §

7-11-505

.

For provision that the defendant may be absent during arraignment, plea and imposition of sentence for offenses punishable by fine or imprisonment of not more than one year, see Rule 43, W.R. Cr. P.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, added the present last two sentences.

The 2017 amendment

, effective July 1, 2017, substituted “a court automation fee of twenty-five dollars ($25.00)” for “a court automation fee of ten dollars ($10.00)” in the second sentence.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, substituted “forty dollars ($40.00)” for “twenty-five dollars ($25.00).”

Quoted

in

State ex rel. Hoke v. Owens, 733 P.2d 240,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 396

(Wyo. 1987).

Law reviews. —

For comment, “Miranda and Misdemeanors,” see XIV Land & Water L. Rev. 521 (1979).

For comment, “The Institutional Transfer Statute: Three Challenges to the Imprisonment of Juvenile Offenders,” see XVII Land & Water L. Rev. 643 (1982).

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part two), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 509 (1984).

For article, “The Wyoming Criminal Code Revisited: Reflections after Fifteen Years,” see XXXIII Land and Water L. Rev. 523 (1998).

§ 6-10-104.
Court to fix punishment within prescribed limits.

Within the limits prescribed by law, and subject to W.S.

7-13-108

, the court shall determine and fix the punishment for any felony or misdemeanor, whether the punishment consists of imprisonment, or fine, or both.

History.

Laws 1982, ch. 75, § 3; 1992, ch. 25, § 3.

Cross references. —

As to the prohibition on importing tobacco products in violation of federal law, see §

35-7-1502

.

Sentence must be within limits of minimum and maximum punishment prescribed by statute

for the particular offense, and a sentence within such limits will not be disturbed absent a clear abuse of discretion. Williams v. State, 692 P.2d 233,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 352

(Wyo. 1984).

Review of sentence for abuse of discretion. —

The common-law rule that a sentence is not subject to appellate review if it is within the limits set by the legislature is not followed in Wyoming; instead, a sentence may be reviewed for abuse of discretion. Wright v. State, 670 P.2d 1090,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 373

(Wyo. 1983), reh'g denied, 707 P.2d 153,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 575

(Wyo. 1985).

Illegal Sentence. —

A requirement that defendant serve his term of incarceration concurrent with a sentence for which he was presently incarcerated, as well as consecutive to a probationary period that had yet to begin was improper because it was impossible to meet both those requirements, and because the sentence as pronounced would require the period of incarceration to be interrupted by a period of probation. Thus, the sentence was illegal.
Cothren v. State, 2012 WY 102, 281 P.3d 352,

2012 Wyo. LEXIS 109

(Wyo. 2012).

Applied

in

Hopkinson v. State, 704 P.2d 1323,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 542

(Wyo. 1985).

Cited

in

Jenkins v. State, 22 Wyo. 34, 134 P. 260,

1913 Wyo. LEXIS 35

(1913); Nicholson v. State, 24 Wyo. 347, 157 P. 1013,

1916 Wyo. LEXIS 35

(1916); State v. Faulkner, 75 Wyo. 104, 292 P.2d 1045,

1956 Wyo. LEXIS 3

(1956); Arnold v. State, 76 Wyo. 445, 306 P.2d 368,

1957 Wyo. LEXIS 6

, 65 A.L.R.2d 839 (1957); Jones v. State, 2003 WY 154, 79 P.3d 1021,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 184

(Wyo. 2003).

Law reviews. —

For article, “The Operation of Wyoming Statutes on Probation and Parole,” see 7 Wyo. L.J. 104.

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part two), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 509 (1984).

For comment, “Reforming Criminal Sentencing in Wyoming,” see XX Land & Water L. Rev. 575 (1985).

For article, “The Wyoming Criminal Code Revisited: Reflections after Fifteen Years,” see XXXIII Land and Water L. Rev. 523 (1998).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Right to credit on state sentence for time served under sentence of court of separate jurisdiction where state court fails to specify in that regard, 90 ALR3d 408.

Defendant's right to credit for time spent in halfway house, rehabilitation center, or other restrictive environment as condition of probation, 24 ALR4th 789.

Computation of incarceration time under work-release or “hardship” sentences, 28 ALR4th 1265.

Propriety of sentencing judge's consideration of defendant's perjury or lying in pleas or testimony in present trial, 34 ALR4th 888.

Propriety of applying cash bail to payment of fine, 42 ALR5th 547.

Downward departure under state sentencing guidelines based on extraordinary family circumstances, 106 ALR5th 377.

Excessiveness of sentence, under 18 USC § 751(a), for escape from federal custody, 77 ALR Fed 318.

Downward departure from United States Sentencing Guidelines (USSG §§ 1A1.1 et seq.) based on vulnerability to abuse in prison, 155 ALR Fed 327.

Downward departure from United States Sentencing Guidelines (U.S.S.G. § 1A1.1 et seq.) based on aberrant behavior, 164 ALR Fed 61.

§ 6-10-105.
Commitment for refusal to pay fine or costs; rate per day.

A person committed to jail for willfully refusing to pay a fine or costs may be imprisoned if the court determines that the defendant has an ability to pay or that a reasonable probability exists that the defendant will have an ability to pay, until the imprisonment, at the rate of fifteen dollars ($15.00) per day, equals the amount of the fine or costs, or the amount shall be paid or secured to be paid when he is discharged.

History.

Laws 1982, ch. 75, § 3; 2011, ch. 129, § 101.

Cross references. —

As to imprisonment for debt, see art. 1, § 5, Wyo. Const.

As to commitment until fine and costs paid, see §

7-11-504

.

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, inserted “willfully” and “if the court determines that the defendant has an ability to pay or that a reasonable probability exists that the defendant will have an ability to pay.”

Section unconstitutional as applied to indigents. —

This section and §§

5-6-211

,

7-11-504

and 7-16-128 (repealed) are unconstitutional as applied to an indigent person who lacks the means to pay a fine; however, imprisonment is not precluded as an enforcement method when alternative means are unsuccessful despite the defendant's reasonable efforts to satisfy the fines by those means. Whiteplume v. City of Riverton, Civ. No. C81-068K (D. Wyo. 1981).

Cited

in

In re MacDonald, 4 Wyo. 150, 33 P. 18,

1893 Wyo. LEXIS 7

(1893); Fisher v. McDaniel, 9 Wyo. 457, 64 P. 1056,

1901 Wyo. LEXIS 23

(1901); Jenkins v. State, 22 Wyo. 34, 134 P. 260,

1913 Wyo. LEXIS 35

(1913).

Law reviews. —

For note on the assessment and collection of the costs of a criminal prosecution in Wyoming, see 13 Wyo. L.J. 178 (1959).

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part two), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 509 (1984).

For article, “The Wyoming Criminal Code Revisited: Reflections after Fifteen Years,” see XXXIII Land and Water L. Rev. 523 (1998).

§ 6-10-106.
Rights lost by conviction of felony; restoration.

A person convicted of a felony is incompetent to be an elector or juror or to hold any office of honor, trust or profit within this state, unless:

His conviction is reversed or annulled;

He receives a pardon;

His rights are restored pursuant to W.S. 7-13-105(a); or

His rights as an elector are restored pursuant to W.S. 7-13-105(b) and (c), in which case the person shall remain incompetent to be a juror or to hold any office of honor, trust or profit within this state.

History.

Laws 1982, ch. 75, § 3; 1987, ch. 157, § 2; 2003, ch. 132, § 1.

Cross references. —

For constitutional provision disqualifying persons convicted of infamous crimes from voting, unless restored to civil rights, see art. 6, § 6, Wyo. Const.

For provision that a person who has been convicted of malfeasance in office or of any felony or other high crime shall not be competent to act as a juror, see §

1-11-102

.

As to commission and conviction of a crime involving moral turpitude or constituting a breach of oath of office as creating vacancies in elective office, see §

22-18-101

.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Laws 2003, ch. 132, § 2, provides: “The intent of this act is to provide an opportunity to restore voting rights lost by persons convicted of felonies other than violent felonies regardless of when the conviction occurred. Nothing in this act shall be construed to affect the governor's powers under W.S.

7-13-105

to restore any rights lost pursuant to W.S.

6-10-106

.”

Section is not unconstitutional.

Pote v. State, 695 P.2d 617,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 445

(Wyo. 1985).

District court order dismissing inmates' complaint brought under 42 USCS § 1983, challenging Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

6-10-106

, which denied them, as convicted felons, the right to vote, was upheld on appeal. Woodruff v. Wyoming, 49 Fed. Appx. 199,

2002 U.S. App. LEXIS 21060

(10th Cir. Wyo. 2002).

Prisoner not under legal disability. —

Under
Wyo. Stat. Ann §

1-3-107

(2005), imprisonment is not a “legal disability other than minority” that suspends the running of the statute of limitations, because a convicted felon is not “legally dead” in Wyoming, and both convicted felons and prisoners have the right to file lawsuits.
Ballinger v. Thompson, 2005 WY 101, 118 P.3d 429,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 121

(Wyo. 2005).

Convicted felon allowed to run for office. —

Article 6, § 6, Wyo. Const., and this section provide that a person who has been convicted of a felony is prohibited from holding public office. They do not say such person is prohibited from running for office. Hamburg v. State, 820 P.2d 523,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 166

(Wyo. 1991), reh'g denied,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 189

(Wyo. Dec. 4, 1991).

Quoted

in

Blake v. Rupe, 651 P.2d 1096,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 383

(Wyo. 1982).

Law reviews. —

For note on indirect legal consequences of a conviction for a felony, see 13 Wyo. L.J. 62 (1958).

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part two), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 509 (1984).

For article, “The Wyoming Criminal Code Revisited: Reflections after Fifteen Years,” see XXXIII Land and Water L. Rev. 523 (1998).

§ 6-10-107.
Minimum term of imprisonment.

The minimum term of imprisonment in any state penal institution is not less than one (1) year.

History.

Laws 1982, ch. 75, § 3; 1992, ch. 25, § 3.

Cross references. —

As to sentence and imprisonment, see §§

7-13-101

through

7-13-915

.

As to sentence and judgment, see Rule 32, W.R. Cr. P.

Applied

in

Evanson v. State, 546 P.2d 412,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 171

(Wyo. 1976).

Stated

in

Daugherty v. State, 2002 WY 52, 44 P.3d 28,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 53

(Wyo. 2002).

Cited

in

Jenkins v. State, 22 Wyo. 34, 134 P. 260,

1913 Wyo. LEXIS 35

(1913).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Disparity and the Sentencing Process in Wyoming District Courts: Recommendations for Change,” see XI Land & Water L. Rev. 525 (1976).

For article, “The Changing Structure of Criminal Sentencing,” see XVIII Land & Water L. Rev. 591 (1983).

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part two), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 509 (1984).

For article, “The Wyoming Criminal Code Revisited: Reflections after Fifteen Years,” see XXXIII Land and Water L. Rev. 523 (1998).

§ 6-10-108.
Disposition of fines.

An officer who collects a fine, unless otherwise required by law, shall pay the fine into the general fund of the county in which the fine was assessed within thirty (30) days of receipt. The officer shall obtain duplicate treasurer’s receipts and deposit one (1) with the county clerk.

History.

Laws 1982, ch. 75, § 3.

Cross references. —

For constitutional provision as to fines and penalties belonging to the public school fund, see art. 7, § 5, Wyo. Const.

For provision as to fines collected by a judge of a circuit court to be paid into the general fund of the city or town whose ordinance was violated, see §

5-9-106

.

For provision as to paying all fines under the general laws of the state into the county treasury to the credit of the public school fund of the county, see §

5-9-106

.

For provision requiring judge of the circuit court to deposit fine with the county or state treasurer and penalty for not so doing, see §

5-9-146

.

For provision that the county attorney shall bring suit to collect fines, see §

5-9-152

.

For provision requiring sheriff to pay and account for all monies coming into his office, see §

18-3-609

.

For provision as to county officials paying over fines to the county treasurer, see §

18-3-814

.

Law reviews. —

For article, “The Wyoming Criminal Code Revisited: Reflections after Fifteen Years,” see XXXIII Land and Water L. Rev. 523 (1998).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Propriety of applying cash bail to payment of fine, 42 ALR5th 547.

§ 6-10-109.
Sentences for felonies.

Wherever in this or in any other title of the Wyoming statutes a statute makes reference to a term of imprisonment or a sentence to the penitentiary, or other references to incarceration in a state penal institution, such references shall include the Wyoming state penitentiary, the Wyoming women’s center or any other state penal institution created by law for the incarceration of convicted felons. The place of incarceration of a convicted felon shall be determined as provided by W.S.

7-13-108

.

History.

Laws 1982, ch. 75, § 3; 1992, ch. 25, § 3.

Cross references. —

As to state institutions, see §

25-1-201

.

§ 6-10-110.
[Renumbered.]

Renumbered by Laws 1987, ch. 157, § 3.

Cross references. —

For present provisions relating to restitution, see §

7-9-102

.